Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5188.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 835. (1) After 6 months' time has elapsed from Not less than 6 months after the date of a personal injury, any liability resulting from the personal injury may be redeemed by the payment of a lump sum by agreement of the parties, subject to the approval of a worker's compensation magistrate. If, special circumstances are found which in the judgment of the worker's compensation magistrate, special circumstances are found that require the payment of a lump sum, the worker's compensation magistrate may direct at any time in any case that the deferred payments due under this act be commuted on the present worth at 10% per annum to 1 or more lump sum payments and that the lump sum payments shall must be made by the employer or carrier. When a proposed redemption agreement is filed, it may be treated as a lump sum application, within the discretion of a worker's compensation magistrate. The filing of a proposed redemption agreement or lump sum application shall must not be considered an admission of liability and if the worker's compensation magistrate treats a proposed redemption agreement as a lump sum application under this section, the employer shall be is entitled to a hearing on the question of liability. (2) The carrier shall notify the employer in writing, which may be electronically transmitted, of the proposed redemption agreement not less than 10 business days before a hearing on the proposed redemption agreement is held. The notice shall must include all of the following information: (a) The amount and conditions of the proposed redemption agreement. (b) The procedure available for requesting a private informal managerial level conference. (c) The name and business phone number of a representative of the carrier familiar with the case. (d) The time and place of the hearing on the proposed redemption agreement and the right of the employer to object to it. (3) The worker's compensation magistrate may waive the requirements of subsection (2) if the carrier provides evidence that a good-faith effort has been made to provide the required notice or if the employer has consented in writing to the proposed redemption. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, for all proposed redemption agreements filed after December 31, 1983, each Each party to the a proposed redemption agreement shall be is liable for a fee of $100.00 to be used to defray costs incurred by the agency, the worker's compensation board of magistrates, and the worker's workers' disability compensation appellate appeals commission administering this act. , except that in the case of multiple defendants the fee for the party defendant shall be $100.00 to be paid by the carrier covering the most recent date of injury. The agency shall develop a system to provide for the collection of the fee provided for by this subsection. (5) The fees collected pursuant to under subsection (4) shall must be placed in the worker's compensation administrative revolving fund under section 835a. Money in the worker's compensation administrative revolving fund shall only must be used only to pay for costs in regard to the following specific purposes of the agency, the worker's compensation board of magistrates, and the Michigan workers' disability compensation appellate appeals commission as applicable: (a) Education and training. (b) Case management. (c) Hearings and claims for review. (6) Subsections (2) to (5) only apply to proposed redemption agreements filed after December 31, 1983.